Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 27

Department of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities

4-3-2701. Creation — General functions.

There is created the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

The general functions of the department are to coordinate, set standards for, plan for, monitor, and promote the development and provision of services and supports to meet the needs of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities through the public and private sectors in this state as set out in applicable provisions of title 33.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 147 provided that a transition team shall be established within the division of intellectual disability services to facilitate the transition of the division into the department of intellectual and development disabilities. The transition team shall be led by the deputy commissioner of the division of intellectual disability services and shall consist of such other persons deemed necessary by the deputy commissioner as integral in establishing the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities. The transition team is encouraged to seek input from the various effected stakeholders and any past deputy commissioner of the division of intellectual disability services. The deputy commissioner shall call meetings of the transition team as needed; provided that at least one (1) meeting shall occur prior to August 1, 2010. The transition team shall review Acts 2010, ch. 1100 to facilitate transition and may make recommendations for amendments to Act 2010, ch. 1100 in furtherance of establishing the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities prior to the legislative bill filing cut off dates established for the first session of the one hundred seventh general assembly.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2702. Commissioner.

The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall be in the charge of a commissioner, who shall be appointed by the governor in the same manner as are other commissioners and who shall have the same official status as other commissioners.

The commissioner shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor, and the commissioner's compensation shall be fixed by the governor and paid from the appropriation available to such department.

The commissioner shall be appointed without regard to residence on the basis of merit as measured by administrative abilities and a demonstrated quality of leadership, and must have a recognized graduate degree as a psychiatrist, doctor of medicine, behavioral scientist, social scientist, educator or other profession involved with human development, human welfare or human relations, with experience in public administration; and shall further have a professional background in the area of intellectual or developmental disabilities, and an understanding of the conditions of human development, intellectual or developmental disabilities, human welfare and social services.

No person shall be eligible to appointment as commissioner unless such person is at least thirty (30) years of age and has five (5) years of administrative experience, including at least three (3) years of full time management experience in private enterprise, private practice or public service.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 10; 2011, ch. 158, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2703. Powers and duties.

The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities has jurisdiction and control over the intellectual and developmental disabilities facilities of the state, regardless of the names by which the facilities are known.

The department, through its appropriate officials, has the duty and power to provide the best possible care for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities in the state by improving existing facilities, by developing future facilities and programs, and by adopting a preventive program for intellectual and developmental disabilities, all as provided in title 33, with control over those services and supports as set out in title 33, chapter 5.

Licensing of these facilities shall be the responsibility of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities under title 33, chapter 2, part 4.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 10; 2012, ch. 1010, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2704. Construction with federal law, rule or regulation.

Any provision of chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, or application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 148.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 146 provided that a transition team shall be established within the division of intellectual disability services to facilitate the transition of the division into the department of intellectual and development disabilities. The transition team shall be led by the deputy commissioner of the division of intellectual disability services and shall consist of such other persons deemed necessary by the deputy commissioner as integral in establishing the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities. The transition team is encouraged to seek input from the various effected stakeholders and any past deputy commissioner of the division of intellectual disability services. The deputy commissioner shall call meetings of the transition team as needed; provided that at least one (1) meeting shall occur prior to August 1, 2010. The transition team shall review Acts 2010, ch. 1100 to facilitate transition and may make recommendations for amendments to Act 2010, ch. 1100 in furtherance of establishing the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities prior to the legislative bill filing cut off dates established for the first session of the one hundred seventh general assembly.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2705. Transfer to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on January 15, 2011, all duties of the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of finance and administration, whose duties fall within those duties required to be performed by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, shall be transferred to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on January 15, 2011, all employees of the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of finance and administration, whose duties fall within those duties transferred to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, shall be transferred to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, papers or other writings in the possession of the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of finance and administration with respect to administering the provisions of title 33, chapter 5, assigned to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities by chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities. The transfer of all such reports, documents, surveys, books, records, papers or other writings shall be subject to any necessary consent by a federal court due to the requirements of litigation.

All leases, contracts and all contract rights and responsibilities in existence with the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of finance and administration with respect to the duties transferred by this act to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall be preserved and transferred to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

All assets, liabilities and obligations of the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of finance and administration with respect to the duties transferred by chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010 to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall become the assets, liabilities and obligations of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 149; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of mental health and substance abuse services, §§4-3-101,4-3-1601.

4-3-2706. Continuing effect of contracts and leases.

Contracts or leases entered into prior to January 15, 2011, with respect to any program or function transferred to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities with any entity, corporation, agency, enterprise or person, shall continue in full force and effect as to all essential provisions in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contracts in existence on January 15, 2011, to the same extent as if such contracts had originally been entered into by and between such entity, corporation, agency, enterprise or person and the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, unless and until such contracts or leases are amended or modified by the parties thereto or until the expiration of such contract.

This part shall not be implemented in any manner which violates the prohibition against impairment of contract obligations as contained in the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 20.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 150.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2707. Authority of the department.

On January 15, 2011, the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, through its commissioner, shall have the authority to receive, administer, allocate, disburse and supervise any grants and funds from whatever sources, including, but not limited to, the federal, state, county and municipal governments on a state, regional, county or any other basis, with respect to any programs or responsibilities outlined in chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, or assigned to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities by law, regulation or order. Exercise of this authority shall not be inconsistent with laws or regulations governing the appropriation and disbursement of funds as administered by the department of finance and administration.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 151.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2708. Continuing effect of current rules, regulations, orders, decisions and policies.

All current rules, regulations, orders, decisions and policies heretofore issued or promulgated by an agency of state government whose functions have been transferred under chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities shall remain in full force and effect and shall hereafter be administered and enforced by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities. To this end, the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, through its commissioner, shall have the authority, consistent with the statutes and regulations pertaining to the programs and functions transferred herein, to modify or rescind orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies heretofore issued and to adopt, issue or promulgate new orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies as may be necessary for the administration of the programs or functions herein transferred.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 152.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2709. Construction of part.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as expanding or reducing programs or services or as expanding or reducing eligibility for such programs or services.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 154.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2710. No reimbursement for travel expenses — Exhaustion of existing supplies and materials.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, members of the statewide planning and policy council for the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities created by § 33-5-601 shall serve without reimbursement for their actual travel expenses.

All agencies effected by chapter 1100 of the Public Acts of 2010, shall exhaust existing supplies and materials, including letterhead, brochures and pamphlets, and shall make every effort to eliminate or minimize other expenses due to the creation of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 155.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 157 provided that subsection (a) of this section shall take effect January 15, 2011, and that subsection (b) shall take effect June 23, 2010.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-2711. Council on autism spectrum disorder.

There is created the Tennessee council on autism spectrum disorder to establish a long-term plan for a system of care for individuals with autism spectrum disorder and their families. The council shall make recommendations and provide leadership in program development regarding matters concerning all levels of autism spectrum disorder services, including, but not limited to, health care, education, and other adult, adolescent, and children's services.

The council shall consist of the following members:

The commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of education or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of human services or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee;

The deputy commissioner of the bureau of TennCare or the deputy commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services or the commissioner's designee;

The executive director of the commission on children and youth or the executive director's designee;

One (1) representative of the council on developmental disabilities; and

Nine (9) adults who have a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder, or who are either family members or primary caregivers of persons with a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder. Three (3) of these adult members shall represent each grand division of the state, and these persons shall be appointed by the governor after the governor receives nominations from Tennessee not-for-profit organizations that serve persons with autism spectrum disorder and their families;

Initial appointees to the council pursuant to subdivision (b)(10)(A) shall serve staggered terms as follows:

Persons appointed from the western grand division shall serve initial terms terminating on June 30, 2019;

Persons appointed from the middle grand division shall serve initial terms terminating on June 30, 2020; and

Persons appointed from the eastern grand division shall serve initial terms terminating on June 30, 2021;

Following the expiration of members' initial terms as prescribed in subdivision (b)(10)(B), all appointments to the council shall be for terms of three (3) years and shall begin on July 1 and terminate on June 30, three (3) years thereafter;

All members shall serve until the expiration of the term to which they were appointed and until their successors are appointed and qualified;

Successors shall be appointed from the same grand divisions from which the members they are replacing were initially appointed;

Members shall be eligible for reappointment to the council following the expiration of their terms, but shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive three-year terms.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The governor shall appoint a chair from the members named to the council.

The council shall meet quarterly and may meet more often upon a call of the chair.

The council shall be administratively attached to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities. All appropriate agencies of state government shall provide assistance to the council upon request of the council.

If vacancies occur on the council for any cause, the vacancies shall be filled by the respective appointing authority within sixty (60) days for the duration of the unexpired term, if applicable.

No council members shall receive compensation, nor shall members be entitled to reimbursement for actual travel and other expenses incurred in attending any meeting and in performing any duties prescribed in this part.

The council shall:

Assess the current and future impact of autism spectrum disorder on the residents of the state;

Assess the availability of programs and services currently provided for early screening, diagnosis, and treatment of autism spectrum disorder;

Seek additional input and recommendations from stakeholders, including, but not limited to, families, providers, clinicians, institutions of higher education, and those concerned with the health and quality of life for individuals with autism spectrum disorder;

Develop a comprehensive statewide plan for an integrated system of training, treatment, and services for individuals with autism spectrum disorder;

Ensure interagency collaboration as the comprehensive statewide system of care for individuals with autism spectrum disorder is developed and implemented;

Coordinate available resources related to developing and implementing a system of care for individuals with autism spectrum disorder; and

Coordinate state budget requests related to systems of care for individuals with autism spectrum disorder based on the studies and recommendations of the council.

Acts 2017, ch. 86, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee council on autism spectrum disorder, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.